Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202581-1803
Committee; members; terms.

(1) Except as otherwise provided in section 81-1802 or subsection (2) of this section, a member of the committee shall serve for a term of four years. The term of each public member shall begin on October 1.

(2) One of the two public members appointed pursuant to subdivision (2)(b)(i) of section 81-1802 shall serve a two-year term. One of the two public members appointed pursuant to subdivision (2)(b)(ii) of section 81-1802 shall serve a two-year term. Thereafter, all members shall serve four-year terms.

Laws 1978, LB 910, § 3;

Laws 1986, LB 540, § 4;

Laws 2009, LB598, § 4;

Laws 2015, LB605, § 89;

Laws 2025, LB499, § 2.